North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159B. Joint Municipal Electric Power and Energy Act.
Article 2. Joint Agencies; Municipalities.
§ 159B-16.1.
Revenues — NCEMPA members.

A municipality is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its electric system or its interest in any joint project. Before it revises its rates, fees or charges as authorized under this subsection, a municipality shall hold a public hearing on the matter. A notice of the hearing shall be published at least once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality. The notice shall state that the public hearing will be held in connection with the municipality’s action to revise its rates, fees, or charges authorized in this section and state the amount of the proposed revision. At the hearing, any retail electric customer of the municipality may appear and be heard on the proposed revision to the rates, fees, or charges. The provisions of

G.S. 160A-81

shall apply to any public hearing held under this subsection. The provisions of this subsection relating to a public hearing shall not apply to action required to be taken for a municipality by the Local Government Commission, in accordance with

G.S. 159-181(c)

, or to action required to be taken by a municipality to revise its rates, fees or charges authorized in this subsection if the revision is required to be implemented immediately as a result of a catastrophic event or to avoid impairing the ability of the municipality to comply with applicable law or its contractual obligations relating to its outstanding bonds or other indebtedness. For so long as any bonds of a municipality or amounts payable or to become payable by a municipality to a joint agency are unpaid, or the payment of which is not fully provided for, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its electric system, and its interest in any joint project, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution or trust agreement authorizing and securing bonds, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all general obligation bonds heretofore or hereafter issued to finance additions, improvements and betterments to its electric system, and to pay any and all amounts which the municipality may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract, including, but not limited to, a support contract authorized by

G.S. 159B-12

.

A joint agency is hereby authorized to fix, charge, and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its projects or otherwise as authorized by this Chapter. A joint agency may only take action to change the rates, fees, or charges authorized in this subsection in a public meeting. Notice of the public meeting shall be given to each municipality that is a member of the joint agency. A notice of the meeting shall be published at least once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in each municipality that is a member of the joint agency. The notice shall state that the public meeting will be held in connection with the joint agency’s action to revise its rates, fees, or charges authorized in this subsection and state the amount of the proposed revision. The provisions of this subsection relating to publication of a notice shall not apply to action required to be taken by a joint agency to revise its rates, fees or charges authorized in this subsection if the revision is required to be implemented immediately as a result of a catastrophic event or to avoid impairing the ability of the joint agency to comply with applicable law or its contractual obligations relating to its outstanding bonds or other indebtedness. For so long as any bonds of a joint agency are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its projects, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution or trust agreement authorizing and securing bonds, and to pay any and all amounts which the joint agency may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract.

Any pledge of revenues, securities, payments derived by support contracts authorized by

G.S. 159B-12

, or other moneys made by a municipality, joint agency or joint municipal assistance agency pursuant to this Chapter shall be valid and binding from the date the pledge is made. The revenues, securities, support contract payments, and other moneys so pledged and then held or thereafter received by the municipality, joint agency or joint municipal assistance agency or any fiduciary or other depository shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the municipality, joint agency or joint municipal assistance agency without regard to whether such parties have notice thereof. The resolution or trust agreement or any financing statement, continuation statement or other instrument by which a pledge of revenues, securities or other moneys is created need not be filed or recorded in any manner.

This section applies only to all rates, fees, or charges for electric service provided by the North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency (NCEMPA) or a member city or town of the NCEMPA on or after October 1, 2012. The following cities and towns are members of the North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency: Apex, Ayden, Belhaven, Benson, Clayton, Edenton, Elizabeth City, Farmville, Fremont, Greenville, Hamilton, Hertford, Hobgood, Hookerton, Kinston, LaGrange, Laurinburg, Louisburg, Lumberton, New Bern, Pikeville, Red Springs, Robersonville, Rocky Mount, Scotland Neck, Selma, Smithfield, Southport, Tarboro, Wake Forest, Washington, and Wilson.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 574, s. 9; 1985, c. 212, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 888, s. 4; 1995, c. 412, s. 13; 2012-167, ss. 1, 3; 2015-3, s. 7.

§ 159B-17.
Revenues — other municipalities.

A municipality is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its electric system or its interest in any joint project. For so long as any bonds of a municipality or amounts payable or to become payable to a joint agency are unpaid, or the payments of which is not fully provided for, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its electric system, and its interest in any joint project, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution or trust agreement authorizing and securing bonds, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all general obligation bonds heretofore or hereafter issued to finance additions, improvements and betterments to its electric system, and to pay any and all amounts which the municipality may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract, including, but not limited to, a support contract authorized by

G.S. 159B-12

.

A joint agency is hereby authorized to fix, charge, and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its projects or otherwise as authorized by this Chapter. For so long as any bonds of a joint agency are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its projects, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution or trust agreement authorizing and securing bonds, and to pay any and all amounts which the joint agency may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract.

Any pledge of revenues, securities, payments derived from support contracts authorized by

G.S. 159B-12

, or other moneys made by a municipality, joint agency or joint municipal assistance agency pursuant to this Chapter shall be valid and binding from the date the pledge is made. The revenues, securities, support contract payments, and other moneys so pledged and then held or thereafter received by the municipality, joint agency or joint municipal assistance agency or any fiduciary or other depository shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the municipality, joint agency or joint municipal assistance agency without regard to whether such parties have notice thereof. The resolution or trust agreement or any financing statement, continuation statement or other instrument by which a pledge of revenues, securities, support contract payment, or other moneys is created need not be filed or recorded in any manner.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 574, s. 9; 1985, c. 212, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 888, s. 4; 1995, c. 412, s. 13; 2015-3, s. 8.

§ 159B-18.
Trust funds; investment authority.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Chapter. The resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds may provide that any of such moneys may be temporarily invested and reinvested pending the disbursements thereof in such securities and other investments as shall be provided in such resolution or trust agreement, and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulation as this Chapter and such resolution or trust agreement may provide.

Any moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Chapter and any other moneys available to a joint agency for investment may be invested:

As provided in subsection (a) of this section;

As provided in

G.S. 159-30

, except that:

A joint agency may also invest, in addition to the obligations enumerated in

G.S. 159-30

(c)(2), in bonds, debentures, notes, participation certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness issued, or the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed, whether directly or indirectly, by any agency or instrumentality of, or corporation wholly owned by, the United States of America.

For purposes of G.S. 159-30(c)(12), a joint agency may also enter into repurchase agreements with respect to, in addition to the obligations enumerated in G.S. 159-30(c)(12):

Obligations of the Federal Financing Bank, the Federal Farm Credit Bank, the Bank for Cooperatives, the Federal Intermediate Credit Bank, the Federal Land Banks, the Federal Home Loan Banks, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, Fannie Mae, the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Housing Administration, the Farmers Home Administration, and the United States Postal Service;

Bonds, debentures, notes, participation certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness issued, or the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed, whether directly or indirectly, by any agency or instrumentality of, or corporation wholly owned by, the United States of America;

Mortgage-backed pass-through securities guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae;

Direct or indirect obligations which are collateralized by or represent beneficial ownership interests in mortgage-backed pass-through securities guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, Fannie Mae; and

Direct or indirect obligations, trust certificates, or other similar instruments which are both: (i) guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae; (ii) collateralized by or represent beneficial ownership interests in mortgage-backed pass-through securities which are guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae; including, but not limited to, Real Estate Mortgage Investment Conduit Certificates; and (iii) for purposes of the second proviso of G.S. 159-30(c)(12)a., the financial institution serving either as trustee or as fiscal agent for a joint agency holding the obligations subject to the repurchase agreement may also be the provider of the repurchase agreement if the obligations that are subject to the repurchase agreement are held in trust by the trustee or fiscal agent for the benefit of the joint agency;

In mortgage-backed pass-through securities guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae;

In direct or indirect obligations which are collateralized by or represent beneficial ownership interests in mortgage-backed pass-through securities guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae; and

In direct or indirect obligations, trust certificates, or other similar instruments which are (i) guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae, and (ii) collateralized by or represent beneficial ownership interests in mortgage-backed pass-through securities which are guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae, including, but not limited to, Real Estate Mortgage Investment Conduit Certificates.

As provided in G.S. 147-69.2(b6), only with respect to funds deposited in the Catawba Unit No. 1 Decommissioning Trust Fund and the Catawba Unit No. 2 Decommissioning Trust Fund, each established pursuant to a Decommissioning Trust Agreement executed by North Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 1 on June 28, 1990, in accordance with regulations promulgated by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission in Title 10, Chapter 1 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Part 50, as amended from time to time.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 888, s. 5; 1993, c. 445, s. 1; 1995, c. 412, s. 14; 2001-487, s. 14(n); 2021-73, s. 1(a).

§ 159B-19.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this Chapter or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreements, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted hereunder, or, to the extent permitted by law, under such trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or under any agreement or other contract executed by the municipality or joint agency pursuant to this Chapter, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Chapter or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by any joint agency or municipality or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of rents, rates, fees and charges.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-20.
Status of bonds under Uniform Commercial Code.

Whether or not the bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto are of such form and character as to be investment securities under Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in this State, all bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto issued under this Chapter are hereby made investment securities within the meaning of and for all the purposes of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in this State, subject only to the provisions of the bonds pertaining to registration.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-21.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by a municipality or joint agency under the provisions of this Chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and agencies of the State and all political subdivisions, all insurance companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency of the State or any political subdivision for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the State or any political subdivision is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-22.
Agreement of the State.

The State does hereby covenant and agree with the holders of any bonds that so long as any bonds of a municipality or joint agency are outstanding and unpaid the State will not limit or alter the rights vested in such municipality or joint agency to acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, enlarge, better, extend, own, operate and maintain its electric system or any project or interest therein, as the case may be, or to establish, maintain, revise, charge, and collect the rents, rates, fees and charges referred to in this Chapter and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of the bonds or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders, until the bonds, together with interest thereon, interest on any unpaid installment of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the bondholders, are fully paid, met and discharged.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-23.
Limited liability.

Bonds shall be special obligations of the municipality or joint agency issuing them. The principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds shall not be payable from the general funds of the municipality or joint agency. Bonds issued to pay the cost of a project and, except as provided in this subsection, bonds that are not issued to pay the cost of a project shall not constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any of the municipality’s or joint agency’s property or upon any of its income, receipts, or revenues, except the funds pledged under the resolution authorizing the bonds or the trust agreement securing the bonds. Bonds that are not issued to pay the cost of a project and that are secured by a pledge, assignment, mortgage, or grant of a security interest in property shall constitute an encumbrance on the municipality’s or joint agency’s property as provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds or the trust agreement securing the bonds.

Neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of a municipality or of the State are, or may be, pledged for the payment of the principal of or interest on bonds, and no holder of bonds shall have the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the State or a municipality. No holder of bonds issued to pay the cost of a project shall have the right to compel the forfeiture of any of the municipality’s or joint agency’s property in connection with any default on the bonds. A holder of bonds that are not issued to pay the cost of a project and that are secured by a pledge, assignment, mortgage, or grant of a security interest in property may compel the forfeiture of the property to the extent allowed in the resolution authorizing the bonds or the trust agreement securing the bonds.

Every bond issued to pay the cost of a project shall recite in substance that the principal of and interest on the bond is payable solely from the revenues pledged to its payment and that the municipality or joint agency is not obligated to pay the principal or interest except from these revenues. A bond that is not issued to pay the cost of a project shall recite in substance that the principal of and interest on the bond is payable and secured as provided in the resolution authorizing the bond or the trust agreement securing the bond.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1991, c. 513, s. 6.

§ 159B-24.
Approval and sale of bonds.

Prior to the acquisition or the commencement of construction of any project consisting of a system or facilities for the generation of power and energy which is to be financed by the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this Chapter, the participating municipalities or joint agency, as the case may be, shall first obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity and, in the same proceeding, the approval required by

G.S. 159B-4

hereof, in the case of the participating municipalities, or the approval required by

G.S. 159B-11

hereof, in the case of a joint agency, from the North Carolina Utilities Commission under such rules, regulations and procedures as the Commission may prescribe.

No municipality or joint agency shall issue any bonds pursuant to this Chapter unless and until, and only to the extent that, the issuance of such bonds is approved by the Local Government Commission. A participating municipality or joint agency shall file with the secretary of the Local Government Commission an application for Commission approval of the issuance of the bonds upon such form as the said Commission may prescribe, which form shall provide for the submission of such information as the secretary may require concerning the proposed bond issue, the details thereof and the security therefor. Before he accepts the application, the secretary may require the governing board or its representatives to attend a preliminary conference at which time the secretary and his deputies may informally discuss the details of the proposed issue and the security therefor.

After an application in proper form has been filed, and after a preliminary conference if one is required, the secretary shall notify the municipality or joint agency in writing that the application has been filed and accepted for submission to the Commission. The secretary’s statement shall be conclusive evidence that the municipality or joint agency, as the case may be, has complied with the requirements of this section with respect to the filing of an application for approval by the said Local Government Commission.

In determining whether a proposed bond issue shall be approved, the Commission may consider:

The municipality’s or joint agency’s debt management procedures and policies.

Whether the municipality or joint agency is in default with respect to any of its debt service obligations.

Whether, based upon feasibility reports submitted to it, the probable revenues of the project to be financed or the revenues of the municipality’s electric system, as the case may be, will be sufficient to service the proposed bonds.

The Commission may inquire into and give consideration to any other matters that it may believe to have a bearing on whether the issue should be approved except matters which are expressly required by the provisions of this Chapter to be determined by the North Carolina Utilities Commission.

The Commission shall approve the application if, upon the information and evidence it receives, it finds and determines:

(1)

That, based upon engineering studies and feasibility reports submitted to it, the principal amount of the proposed bonds will be adequate and not excessive for the proposed purpose of the issue.

(2)

That the municipality’s or joint agency’s debt management procedures and policies are good, or that reasonable assurances have been given that its debt will henceforth be managed in strict compliance with law.

(3)

That the requirements of this Chapter with respect to the issuance of the bonds and the details thereof and security therefor have been, or will be, satisfied.

That the issuance of the proposed bonds will effectuate the purposes and policies of this Chapter.

After considering an application, the Local Government Commission shall enter its order either approving or denying the application. An order approving an issue shall not be regarded as an approval of the legality of the bonds in any respect.

If the Commission enters an order denying the application, the proceedings under this section shall be at an end.

At any time after the Commission approves an application for the issuance of bonds, the governing board of the issuer may adopt a bond resolution or enter into a trust agreement in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, and may thereafter at one time, or from time to time, issue the bonds as provided herein.

Upon the filing with the Local Government Commission of a resolution of the issuer requesting that its bonds be sold, such bonds may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as the Local Government Commission shall determine to be for the best interest of the issuer and effectuate best the purposes of this Chapter, provided that such sale shall be approved by the issuer.

Except as herein expressly provided, bonds may be issued and sold under the provisions of this Chapter without obtaining the approval or consent of any other department, division, commission, board, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceeding or the happening of any other condition or thing than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1995, c. 412, s. 15.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Tax Increment Financing in North Carolina: The Myth of the Countermajoritarian Difficulty,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1526 (2005).

§ 159B-25.
Refunding bonds.

A municipality or joint agency is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the municipality or joint agency for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this Chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds.

In addition to any refunding bonds that may be issued pursuant to subsection (a), a municipality or joint agency is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds for the purpose of providing for the payment of any interest accrued or to accrue on any bonds which shall have been issued by the joint agency under the provisions of this Chapter; provided, however, that the refunding bonds are issued on or prior to June 30, 1992, and the latest maturity of the refunding bonds issued for a project is no later than the latest maturity of any other bonds issued by the municipality or joint agency, as the case may be, then outstanding for the same project; and provided further that the Local Government Commission shall conduct an evidentiary hearing and upon the evidence presented find and determine that:

The municipality’s or the joint agency’s debt will be managed in strict compliance with law;

The requirements of this Chapter with respect to the issuance of its bonds and the details thereof and security therefor have been and will be satisfied;

The estimated revenues of the project or the revenues of the municipality’s electric system, as the case may be, will be sufficient to service all bonds to be outstanding after the issuance of the refunding bonds;

The application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds will result in the deferral of recovery in rates of a portion of the capital costs of the project for a reasonable period of time;

All capital costs of the project will be recovered over a period ending, and all bonds issued for the project will mature, no later than the end of the then estimated useful economic life of the project;

The issuance of the bonds is in the best interest of the municipality’s or joint agency’s electricity customers; and

The bond rating of the State and its several political subdivisions and agencies allowed to issue bonds should not be adversely affected.

The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the municipality or joint agency in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this Chapter which relate to the issuance of bonds, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate thereto.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1989, c. 735, s. 2; 1995, c. 412, s. 16.

§ 159B-26.
Tax exemption.

Bonds shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any political subdivision or any of their agencies, excepting inheritance or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the bonds, and franchise taxes. The interest on the bonds is not subject to taxation as income.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1995, c. 46, s. 18.

§ 159B-27.
Taxes; payments in lieu of taxes.

A project jointly owned by municipalities or owned by a joint agency shall be exempt from property taxes; provided, however, that each municipality possessing an ownership share of a project, and a joint agency owning a project, shall, in lieu of property taxes, pay to any governmental body authorized to levy property taxes the amount which would be assessed as taxes on real and personal property of a project if such project were otherwise subject to valuation and assessment by the Department of Revenue. Such payments in lieu of taxes shall be due and shall bear interest if unpaid, as in the cases of taxes on other property. Payments in lieu of taxes made hereunder shall be treated in the same manner as taxes for purposes of all procedural and substantive provisions of law. Any administrative building and associated land shall be deemed a project for purposes of this paragraph.

through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-316, s. 4.1(a), effective July 1, 2014.

(f)

Except as herein expressly provided with respect to jointly owned projects or projects owned by a joint agency, no other property of a municipality used or useful in the generation, transmission and distribution of electric power and energy shall be subject to payments in lieu of taxes.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 193; 1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1977, c. 385, s. 12; 1981, c. 487; 1983, c. 574, s. 10; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1097, s. 11; 1995, c. 412, s. 17; 2002-120, s. 6; 2013-316, s. 4.1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

§ 159B-28.
Personnel.

Personnel employed or appointed by a municipality to work on a joint project or for a joint agency shall have the same authority, rights, privileges and immunities (including coverage under the workers’ compensation laws) which the officers, agents and employees of the appointing municipality enjoy within the territory of that municipality, whether within or without the territory of the appointing municipality, when they are acting within the scope of their authority or in the course of their employment.

Personnel employed or appointed directly by a joint agency or by a nonprofit operating agency of the participating municipalities or of the joint agency, shall be qualified for participation in the North Carolina Local Government Employees Retirement System with the same rights, privileges, obligations and responsibilities as they would have if they were employees of a municipality.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1991, c. 636, s. 3.

§ 159B-29.
Dissolution of joint agencies.

Whenever the governing board of a joint agency and the governing boards of its member municipalities shall by resolution or ordinance determine that the purposes for which the joint agency was formed have been substantially fulfilled and that all bonds theretofore issued and all other obligations theretofore incurred by the joint agency have been fully paid or satisfied, the governing board of the joint agency may by resolution declare the joint agency to be dissolved. On the effective date of such resolution declaring the joint agency to be dissolved, the title to all funds and other property owned by the joint agency at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the member municipalities of the joint agency as provided in this Chapter and the bylaws of the joint agency. Notice of such dissolution shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1995, c. 412, s. 18.

§ 159B-30.
Annual reports.

Each joint agency shall, following the closing of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the governing boards of its member municipalities and to the North Carolina Utilities Commission. Each such report shall set forth in a form prescribed by the North Carolina Utilities Commission a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the joint agency during such year. The joint agency shall cause an audit of its books of record and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountant(s) and the cost thereof may be treated as a part of the cost of construction of a project or projects, or otherwise as part of the expense of administration of a project covered by such audit.

The municipalities possessing ownership interests in a project shall, following the closing of each fiscal year, submit a consolidated or combined annual report of their activities with respect to such project for the preceding year to the respective governing board of such municipalities and to the North Carolina Utilities Commission. Each such report shall set forth in a form prescribed by the North Carolina Utilities Commission a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the jointly owned project during such year. The municipalities possessing ownership interests in a project shall cause an audit of the books of record and accounts relating to such project to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountant(s) and the cost thereof may be treated as a cost of construction of the project, or otherwise as part of the expenses of the administration of the project covered by such audit.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-30.1.
Additional reports.

Beginning March 1, 1996, and annually thereafter, each joint agency operating under the authority of Chapter 159B of the General Statutes shall file a report with the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources the activities of the joint agency carried out pursuant to the authority granted by

G.S. 159B-2

, 159B-11(19b), 159B-12 and 159B-17(c). The report shall cover the preceding calendar year. Each joint agency shall file such additional reports as the committees shall request.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 888, s. 7; 1995, c. 412, s. 19; 2011-291, s. 2.62; 2017-57, s. 14.1(bb).

§ 159B-31.
Legislative consent to the application of laws of other states.

Legislative consent is hereby given

To the application of the laws of other states with respect to taxation, payments in lieu of taxes, and the assessment thereof, to any municipality or joint agency created pursuant to this Chapter, which has acquired or has an interest in a project, real or personal, situated without the State, or which owns or operates a project without the State pursuant to this Chapter, and

To the application of regulatory and other laws of other states and of the United States to any municipality or joint agency which owns or operates a project without the State.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-32.
Government grants and loans.

The governing board of any municipality or joint agency is hereby authorized to make application and to enter into contracts for and to accept grants-in-aid and loans from the federal and State governments and their agencies for planning, acquiring, constructing, expanding, maintaining and operating any project or facility, or participating in any research or development program, or performing any function which such municipality or joint agency may be authorized by general or local law to provide or perform.

In order to exercise the authority granted by this section, the governing board of any municipality or joint agency may:

Enter into and carry out contracts with the State or federal government or any agency or institution thereof under which such government, agency or institution grants financial or other assistance to the municipality or joint agency;

Accept such assistance or funds as may be granted or loaned by the State or federal government with or without such a contract;

Agree to and comply with any reasonable conditions which are imposed upon such grants or loans;

Make expenditures from any funds so granted.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.